Idaho, session 2026, H0635.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1209, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1209. PROCEEDINGS TO REVOKE, SUSPEND, DENY OR PLACE REASONABLE
CONDITIONS ON A CERTIFICATE -- LETTERS OF REPRIMAND -- COMPLAINT -- SUBPOENA
POWER -- HEARING. (1) The professional standards commission may conduct
investigations on any signed allegation of unethical conduct of any teacher
brought by:
(a) An individual with a substantial interest in the matter, except a
student in an Idaho public school; or
(b) A local board of trustees.
The allegation shall state the specific ground or grounds for the allegation
of unethical conduct that could lead to a possible revocation, suspension,
placing reasonable conditions on the certificate, or issuance of a letter of
reprimand. Upon receipt of a written and signed allegation of unethical con-
duct, the chief certification officer, in conjunction with the attorney gen-
eral and the professional standards commission investigator, shall conduct
a review of the allegation using established guidelines to determine whether
to remand the issue to the school district to be resolved locally or to open
an investigation and forward the case to the professional standards commis-
sion. Within fourteen (14) days of the decision to forward the case, the
chief certification officer shall notify the complainant and the teacher, in
writing, that an investigation will be conducted and the teacher shall be af-
forded an opportunity to respond to the allegation verbally and in writing
prior to the issuance of the complaint. The executive committee of the pro-
fessional standards commission shall review the circumstances of the for-
warded case at one (1) of the two (2) next regularly scheduled meetings, and
determine whether probable cause exists to warrant the filing of a complaint
and the requesting of a hearing.
(2) Proceedings to revoke or suspend any certificate issued under sec-
tion 33-1201, Idaho Code, or to issue a letter of reprimand or place reason-
able conditions on the certificate shall be commenced by a written complaint
against the holder thereof. Such complaint shall be made by the chief certi-
fication officer stating the ground or grounds for issuing a letter of rep-
rimand, placing reasonable conditions on the certificate, or for revocation
or suspension and proposing that a letter of reprimand be issued, reason-
able conditions be placed on the certificate, or the certificate be revoked
or suspended. A copy of the complaint shall be served upon the certificate


holder, either by personal service or by certified mail, within thirty (30)
days of determination by the executive committee or such other time agreed
to by the teacher and the chief certification officer. Any complaint that
contains information relating to behavior that may be criminal shall be re-
ported to the appropriate law enforcement authorities.
(3) Not more than thirty (30) days after the date of service of any
complaint, the person complained against may request, in writing, a hearing
upon the complaint. Any such request shall be made and addressed to the state
superintendent of public instruction; and if no request for hearing is made,
the grounds for suspension, revocation, placing reasonable conditions on
the certificate, or issuing a letter of reprimand stated in the complaint
shall be deemed admitted. Upon a request for hearing, the chief certifi-
cation officer shall give notice, in writing, to the person requesting the
hearing, which notice shall state the time and place of the hearing and which
shall occur not more than ninety (90) days from the request for hearing or
such other time agreed to by the teacher and the chief certification officer.
The time of such hearing shall not be less than five (5) days from the date of
notice thereof. Any such hearing shall be informal and shall conform with
chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The hearing will be held within the school
district in which any teacher complained of shall teach, or at such other
place deemed most convenient for all parties.
(4) Any such hearing shall be conducted by three (3) or more panel mem-
bers appointed by the chairman of the professional standards commission, a
majority of whom shall hold a position of employment the same as the person
complained against. One (1) of the panel members shall serve as the panel
chair. The panel chair shall be selected by the chairman of the professional
standards commission from a list of former members of the professional stan-
dards commission who shall be instructed in conducting administrative hear-
ings. No commission member who participated in the probable cause determi-
nation process in a given case shall serve on the hearing panel. All hear-
ings shall be held with the object of ascertaining the truth. Any person com-
plained against may appear in person and may be represented by legal counsel,
and may produce, examine and cross-examine witnesses, and, if he chooses to
do so, may submit for the consideration of the hearing panel a statement, in
writing, in lieu of oral testimony, but any such statement shall be under
oath and the affiant shall be subject to cross-examination.
(5) The state superintendent of public instruction, as authorized by
the state board of education, has the power to issue subpoenas and compel
the attendance of witnesses and compel the production of pertinent papers,
books, documents, records, accounts and testimony. The state board or its
authorized representative may, if a witness refuses to attend or testify or
to produce any papers required by such subpoena, report to the district court
in and for the county in which the proceeding is pending, by petition, set-
ting forth that a due notice has been given of the time and place of atten-
dance of the witnesses, or the production of the papers, that the witness has
been properly summoned, and that the witness has failed and refused to at-
tend or produce the papers required by this subpoena before the board, or its
representative, or has refused to answer questions propounded to him in the
course of the proceedings, and ask for an order of the court compelling the
witness to attend and testify and produce the papers before the board. The


court, upon the petition of the board, shall enter an order directing the
witness to appear before the court at a time and place to be fixed by the court
in the order, the time to be not more than ten (10) days from the date of the
order, and then and there shall show cause why he has not attended and testi-
fied or produced the papers before the board or its representative. A copy of
the order shall be served upon the witness. If it shall appear to the court
that the subpoena was regularly issued by the board and regularly served, the
court shall thereupon order that the witness appear before the board at the
time and place fixed in the order and testify or produce the required papers.
Upon failure to obey the order, the witness shall be dealt with for contempt
of court. The subpoenas shall be served and witness fees and mileage paid as
allowed in civil cases in the district courts of this state.
(6) Within twenty-one (21) days of the conclusion of any hearing
dealing with the revocation, suspension, denial of a certificate, placing
reasonable conditions on the certificate, or issuing a letter of reprimand,
the hearing panel shall submit to the chief certification officer, to the
person complained against and to the chief administrative officer of the
public school employing the certificate holder, if any, a concise statement
of the proceedings, a summary of the testimony, and any documentary evidence
offered, together with the findings of fact and a decision. The hearing
panel may determine to suspend or revoke the certificate, or the panel may
order that reasonable conditions be placed on the certificate or a letter of
reprimand be sent to the certificate holder, or if there are not sufficient
grounds, the allegation against the certificate holder is dismissed and is
so recorded.
(7) Within three (3) days of issuance, the hearing panel's decision
shall be made a permanent part of the record of the certificate holder.
Should the final decision be to place reasonable conditions upon the cer-
tificate holder or a suspension or revocation of the teaching certificate,
the professional standards commission must notify the employing public
school of the hearing panel's decision and to provide notice that such may
negatively impact upon the employment status of the certificated employee.
(8) The final decision of the hearing panel shall be subject to judicial
review in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code,
in the district court of the county in which the holder of a revoked certifi-
cate has been last employed as a teacher.
(9) Whenever any certificate has been revoked, suspended or has had
reasonable conditions placed upon it, or an application has been denied, the
professional standards commission may, upon a clear showing that the cause
constituting grounds for the listed actions no longer exists, issue a valid
certificate. Provided however, that no certificate shall be issued to any
person who has been convicted of any crime listed in subsection (2) of sec-
tion 33-1208, Idaho Code.
(10) For any person certified in another state and applying for certifi-
cation in Idaho, and for any person previously certified in this state who is
applying for certification in the event their certification has lapsed or is
seeking renewal of a current certification, the chief certification officer
shall deny an application for a new certificate or for a renewal of a cer-
tificate, regardless of the jurisdiction where such certificate was issued,
if there are any unsatisfied conditions on such current or previously is-


sued certificate or if there is any form of pending investigation by a state
agency concerning the applicant's teaching license or certificate. Pro-
vided however, the chief certification officer shall not automatically deny
the application if such person authorized in writing that the chief certi-
fication officer and the professional standards commission shall have full
access to the investigative files concerning the conditions on, or investi-
gation concerning, such certificate in Idaho or any other state or province.
Upon review of the information authorized for release by the applicant, the
chief certification officer shall either grant or deny such application or,
upon denial and upon written request made by the applicant within thirty
(30) days of such denial, shall afford the applicant with the procedures set
forth in subsections (3) through (9) of this section. If the applicant does
not execute the written authorization discussed herein, reapplication may
be made once all investigations have been completed and all conditions have
been satisfied, resulting in a clear certificate from the issuing state or
province.
(11) For the purposes of this section, the term "teacher" shall include
any individual required to hold a certificate pursuant to section 33-1201,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.